Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.330

Denial, revocation, suspension, or condition of licenses, probationary orders—Grounds.

The director may refuse to grant a license or renew a license and may revoke or suspend a license or issue a conditional or probationary order if he or she is satisfied after a hearing, as herein provided, of the existence of any of the following facts, which are hereby declared to be a violation of this chapter:

(1) That fraudulent charges or returns have been made by the applicant, or licensee, for the handling, sale or storage of, or for rendering of any service in connection with the handling, sale or storage of any agricultural product.

(2) That the applicant, or licensee, has failed or refused to render a true account of sales, or to make a settlement thereon, or to pay for agricultural products received, within the time and in the manner required by this chapter.

(3) That the applicant, or licensee, has made any false statement as to the condition, quality, or quantity of agricultural products received, handled, sold, or stored by him or her.

(4) That the applicant, or licensee, directly or indirectly has purchased for his or her own account agricultural products received by him or her upon consignment without prior authority from the consignor together with the price fixed by consignor or without promptly notifying the consignor of such purchase. This shall not prevent any commission merchant from taking to account of sales, in order to close the day's business, miscellaneous lots or parcels of agricultural products remaining unsold, if such commission merchant shall forthwith enter such transaction on his or her account of sales.

(5) That the applicant, or licensee, has intentionally made any false or misleading statement as to the conditions of the market for any agricultural products.

(6) That the applicant, or licensee, has made fictitious sales or has been guilty of collusion to defraud the consignor.

(7) That a commission merchant to whom any consignment is made has reconsigned such consignment to another commission merchant and has received, collected, or charged by such means more than one commission for making the sale thereof, for the consignor, unless by written consent of such consignor.

(8) That the licensee was guilty of fraud or deception in the procurement of such license.

(9) That the licensee or applicant has failed or refused to file with the director a schedule of his or her charges for services in connection with agricultural products handled on account of or as an agent of another, or that the applicant, or licensee, has indulged in any unfair practice.

(10) That the licensee has rejected, without reasonable cause, or has failed or refused to accept, without reasonable cause, any agricultural product bought or contracted to be bought from a consignor by such licensee; or failed or refused, without reasonable cause, to furnish or provide boxes or other containers, or hauling, harvesting, or any other service contracted to be done by licensee in connection with the acceptance, harvesting, or other handling of said agricultural products bought or handled or contracted to be bought or handled; or has used any other device to avoid acceptance or unreasonably to defer acceptance of agricultural products bought or handled or contracted to be bought or handled.

(11) That the licensee has otherwise violated any provision of this chapter and/or rules and regulations adopted hereunder.

(12) That the licensee has knowingly employed an agent, as defined in this chapter, without causing said agent to comply with the licensing requirements of this chapter applicable to agents.

(13) That the applicant or licensee has, in the handling of any agricultural products, been guilty of fraud, deceit, or negligence.

(14) That the licensee has failed or refused, upon demand, to permit the director or his or her agents to make the investigations, examination, or audits, as provided in this chapter, or that the licensee has removed or sequestered any books, records, or papers necessary to any such investigations, examination, or audits, or has otherwise obstructed the same.

(15) That the licensee, without reasonable cause, has failed or refused to execute or carry out a lawful contract with a consignor.

(16) That the licensee has failed or refused to keep and maintain the records as required by this chapter and/or rules and regulations adopted hereunder.

(17) That the licensee has attempted payment by a check the licensee knows not to be backed by sufficient funds to cover such check.

(18) That the licensee has been guilty of fraud or deception in his or her dealings with purchasers including misrepresentation of goods as to grade, quality, weights, quantity, or any other essential fact in connection therewith.

(19) That the licensee has permitted a person to in fact operate his or her own separate business under cover of the licensee's license and bond.

(20) That a commission merchant or dealer has failed to furnish additional bond coverage within fifteen days of when it was requested in writing by the director.

(21) That the licensee has discriminated in the licensee's dealings with consignors on the basis of race, creed, color, national origin, sex, or the presence of any disability.

[ 2020 c 274 s 3; 2011 c 336 s 584; 1989 c 354 s 40; 1982 c 20 s 1; 1981 c 296 s 32; 1977 ex.s. c 304 s 8; 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 11; 1959 c 139 s 33.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.